Tennessee, session 114, HB1471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-22-103(4)(A)(i), is amended by
deleting "an offense, during" and substituting "a felony offense within the previous ten (10)
years, during".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-22-103, is amended by deleting
subdivision (4)(A)(iii).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1471
010276
- 1 -